src/fst/morphology/stems/interjections.lexc
!! Interjections
!  ----------
!! Interjections in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language 

LEXICON Interjections

ʔah+Interj:ʔah # "ah" ;
hay+Interj:hay # "now, well" ;
huy̓+Interj:huy̓ # "good-bye" ;
wiʔaac+Interj:wiʔaac # "hello" ;
habuʔ+v1+Interj:habuʔ # "(I'm listening)" ;
habuʔ+v2+Interj:habu # "(I'm listening)" ;
həmuʔ+Interj:həmuʔ # "(I'm listening)" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
